Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 4 Rights and Responsibilities of Foreign Guardians

29-4-95.
“Foreign guardian” defined; sale of ward’s property.

For purposes of this part, a “foreign guardian” is a guardian or other person who has been given responsibility by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or territory governed by the Constitution of the United States for the care of an incapacitated adult referred to as the “ward” and whose guardianship has not been transferred to and accepted in this state pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title.

Any foreign guardian of a ward who resides in any other state and who is authorized to sell and convey property of the ward may sell property of the ward which is in this state, under the rules and regulations prescribed for the sale of real estate by conservators of this state, provided that the foreign guardian must file and have recorded in the court or other proper court, at the time of petitioning for sale, an authenticated copy of the letters of appointment and must also file with the court or other proper authority bond with good and sufficient security in double the value of the property to be sold for the faithful execution of the guardianship as provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 4/HB 954.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title” for “Part 2 of this article” at the end of subsection (a).

29-4-96.
Power to recover property.

A foreign guardian may institute an action in any court in this state to enforce any right or to recover any property belonging to the ward or accruing to the foreign guardian as such.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-96

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-97.
Required filings with clerk of court.

Pending an action brought by a foreign guardian pursuant to Code Section 29-4-96, an authenticated copy of the letters of guardianship shall be filed with the clerk of the court to become a part of the record, if the case is pending in a court of record, or filed with the papers if the action is a summary proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-97

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-98.
Submission to jurisdiction; registration of guardianship order.

A foreign guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the guardianship by:

Receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property in this state belonging to the ward;

Doing any act as a guardian in this state that would have given this state jurisdiction over the actor as an individual; or

Registering the guardianship order in this state pursuant to Code Section 29-11-30.

With respect to a guardianship order from another state that has been registered with and recorded by a court of this state under Code Section 29-11-30, in addition to any action such court of this state may take under this part or under subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-32, such court of this state may communicate with the appointing court in such other state under subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-4 to inform such appointing court of any proceeding relating to the guardianship initiated in this state under subsection (a) of this Code section, stating the reasons therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-98

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 12/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (a)(1); substituted “; or” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(2); added paragraph (a)(3); and added subsection (b).